Louisiana, session 2026, HB463.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:9109(C)(2) and (7)(b) and 9109.2(C)(1) and (2)(b) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 33:9109.2(C)(2)(e) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§9109. Additional service charge on wireless telecommunications service
* * *
C. Service charge. The governing authority of any district may levy a
CMRS emergency telephone service charge subject to and in accordance with the
provisions of this Subsection. Such service charge:
* * *
(2)(a) Shall not exceed one dollar and twenty-five cents two dollars per
month per wireless CMRS connection or the rate which the district levies or is
authorized to levy on CMRS users on August 1, 2016, whichever is higher.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph,
the governing authority of the Terrebonne Parish Communications District may levy
a CMRS emergency telephone service charge of not more than one dollar and eighty-
five cents per month per wireless CMRS connection.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 463 ENROLLED
(b) A communications district shall not levy a service charge in excess of
one dollar and twenty-five cents per month unless both of the following occur:
(i) The proposed increase is approved by a majority vote of the governing
district.
(ii) The district conducts at least one public hearing on the proposed
increase, with notice published in the official journal of the parish or municipality
at least ten days prior to the hearing.
* * *
(7)(a)
* * *
(b) The service charge shall be collected by each service supplier providing
service in the district. The district shall notify, by certified mail, return receipt
requested, each service supplier providing service in the district, through its
registered agent for service of process in this state, when applicable, of the adoption
of the resolution or ordinance provided for in Paragraph (3) of this Subsection. The
duty of the wireless service supplier to collect any such service charge or any
increase in service charge authorized by this Section shall commence within sixty
days after receipt of such notice.
* * *
§9109.2. Restrictions imposed on use of certain funds
* * *
C.(1) No later than the first of May of each year, the 911 districts shall submit
a consolidated report of statewide 911 communication activity to both the House
Committee on Commerce and the Senate Committee on Commerce, Consumer
Protection and International Affairs of the Louisiana Legislature. A copy of the
consolidated report shall be submitted to the governing authority of each parish in
which a 911 district included in the report is located. Each communications district
shall post the consolidated report on its public website, if it maintains a public
website, within ten calendar days after submission.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 463 ENROLLED
(2) The report shall include, at a minimum, all of the following from the
previous calendar year:
* * *
(b) All expenditures for each 911 district and all expenditures statewide. This
accounting shall identify, at a minimum and where applicable, expenditures for all
of the following:
(i) PSAP personnel and administrative costs.
(ii) PSAP operating costs, including Next Generation 911 implementation
and associated costs for new equipment, services, equipment upgrades, and training.
* * *
(e) Performance metrics, including average call answer times and call
processing times.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on August 1, 2026.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.